Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 21

County Financial Management System of 1981

5-21-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “County Financial Management System of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 1.

Cross-References. County Budgeting Law of 1957, title 5, ch. 12.

County Fiscal Procedure Law of 1957, title 5, ch. 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive [now county mayor] over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

Conflicts involving purchases in school system that has adopted the Local Option Financial Management System Act, OAG 04-107, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (7/09/04).

Proposed Stokes Creek Project, OAG 04-108, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (7/09/04).

In a county operating under the County Financial Management System of 1981, a county board of education does not have the authority to enter into contracts for professional services, such as architectural services, OAG 06-139, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (9/11/06).

A county commission violates T.C.A. § 5-21-111(e)(1) if it votes to reduce the debt service portion of the budget proposed by its budget committee after the budget committee holds a public hearing on its budget proposal and submits that proposal to the commission. OAG 14-09, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/15/14)

County financial management system of 1981 — debt service requirements. OAG 15-02, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/15).

5-21-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Committee” means the county financial management committee;

“Department” means the finance department; and

“Director” means the director of the finance department.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 2.

5-21-103. Finance department — General provisions — County hospitals and nursing homes — Exclusion from coverage of chapter.

There is hereby created a finance department to administer the finances of the county for all funds of the various departments, agencies and boards that are handled by the county trustee.

The accounting, bank accounts, personnel and salary policies, and other policies of the funds and offices of the clerks of courts, county clerk, register of deeds, sheriff and trustee, that were not subject to the budgeting authority of the county legislative body prior to application of this part, are not subject to this part. This part shall not be construed as authority over the fee and commission accounts of other accounts that are not handled by the trustee for offices other than the trustee nor for the trustee's fee and commission account. This part shall not be construed as authority over personnel policies or procedures or salaries of the various county offices or departments, except with respect to requiring necessary recordkeeping and reporting needed for performing the payroll functions as prescribed by the finance committee.

The finance department shall be responsible for purchasing, accounting, budgeting, payroll, cash management and other such financial matters of the county as provided in this chapter.

All employees performing the functions of purchasing, payroll, accounting and budgeting in the various operating departments shall be transferred to the supervision of the director of finance, and such salaries, benefits and expenses relating to such personnel shall be budgeted under the finance department, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary. No employee may be transferred, however, from the office of the trustee, county clerk, assessor of property, clerks of courts, register of deeds or sheriff.

The department shall establish a system of fiscal management, control, accounting, budgeting, purchasing and cash management as herein provided.

The system shall conform to generally accepted accounting principles and shall be in substantial agreement with the comptroller of the treasury uniform audit manual, the rules established by the commissioner of education, and state law.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, the county legislative body may exclude, by two thirds (2/3) majority vote, the county hospitals or nursing homes, or both, from this chapter. In the event county hospitals or nursing homes, or both, are excluded, the county legislative body may establish, after allowing the financial management committee to submit recommendations, financial procedures and reporting requirements to include, but not to be limited to, the following:

Monthly financial reports;

Approval of the required annual audit contract with a licensed Tennessee certified public accountant and the reports presented in such audit;

Inspection of records, bank statements and other financial records; and

Approval of the annual budget by the county legislative body prior to the beginning of the fiscal year.

If a hospital or nursing home, or both, is excluded from this chapter, the county legislative body may by two-thirds (2/3) majority vote include such hospitals or nursing homes, or both, under this chapter. Upon voting to include such hospital or nursing home, or both, implementation of this chapter shall begin no later than the beginning of the next fiscal year.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 3; 1991, ch. 236, § 1; 1993, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 2018, ch. 495, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (d)(2) which read: “Such system shall conform to generally accepted principles of governmental accounting and shall be in substantial agreement with the recommendations of the national council of governmental accounting, and the rules and regulations established by the comptroller of the treasury, commissioner of education and state law.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 495, § 11. February 22, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. Application of the financial management system of 1981 to tenured employees, OAG 91-25, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (3/25/91).

County Financial Management System of 1981: Duties of county trustee, OAG 92-73, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (12/29/92).

Authority of county executive [now county mayor] over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

5-21-104. Financial management committee — General provisions.

A county financial management committee is hereby created.

The committee shall consist of the county mayor, supervisor of highways, director of schools, and four (4) members elected by the county legislative body at its regular September session of each year or at any subsequent session.

The four (4) members elected by the county legislative body need not be members of such body.

Such committee shall elect its own chair and shall meet from time to time as it may deem necessary for the discharge of its duties as provided in this section.

The director shall be the ex officio secretary of such committee.

The committee shall establish and approve policies, procedures and regulations in addition to the specific provisions of this chapter, for implementing a sound and efficient financial system for administering the funds of the county.

Such system shall include budgeting, accounting, purchasing, payroll, cash management and such other financial matters necessary to an efficient system.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. County Financial Management System of 1981: Duties of county trustee, OAG 92-73, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (12/29/92).

Authority of county executive [now county mayor] over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

Tenure of county financial management committee, OAG 03-064, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (5/14/03).

Under T.C.A. § 12-4-101(b), a member of the county financial management committee must disclose his or her indirect interest when voting on contracts that affect his or her spouse's employment contract with the county, especially such matters as the spouse's compensation, but the statute does not require abstention, OAG 05-017, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/03/05).

T.C.A. § 5-21-121 would not prohibit a member of the county financial management committee from being interested in the employment contract between his or her spouse and the county, but since the statute does not define the term, “personal beneficial interest,” therefore, a member could have a prohibited conflict of interest in a purchase of supplies, materials, or equipment for the finance department where his or her spouse is employed, OAG 05-017, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/03/05).

5-21-105. Special committees — General provisions.

The county legislative body may authorize the committee to assume the functions of any or all of the following special committees or the county legislative body may by resolution create:

A budget committee;

An investment committee; or

A purchasing committee.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), upon creation, the special committees shall be composed of a minimum of five (5) members appointed by the county legislative body. The members of such committee need not be members of the county legislative body.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), in counties having the following populations, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, special committees shall be composed of five (5) members:

not less than nor more than

13,375 13,600

46,000 46,500

67,600 67,900

77,800 78,000

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), in counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand two hundred fifty (17,250) nor more than seventeen thousand five hundred fifty (17,550), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the budget committee shall be composed of six (6) members.

The director shall be the ex officio secretary of each such committee.

The budget committee shall establish and approve policies, forms and documents, procedures, and regulations necessary for the preparation of the annual operating and capital improvement budgets.

The investment committee shall establish and approve policies and procedures for cash management and investing idle cash funds in various investments as prescribed by law.

The purchasing committee shall establish and approve policies and procedures for the purchasing of all supplies, equipment or goods for the county.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 5; 1992, ch. 789, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 645, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Investment committee approval for investing funds, § 5-8-301.

5-21-106. Director — Appointment and compensation.

The committee shall appoint the director.

The committee may dismiss the director, subject to the approval of the county legislative body.

The director shall for all purposes be an employee of the county.

The director shall have a minimum of a bachelor of science degree from an accredited college or university. Such person shall have had at least eighteen (18) quarter hours or equivalent semester hours in accounting.

The committee may select a person not having a bachelor of science degree or having a sufficient number of hours in accounting; provided, that such person has at least two (2) years of acceptable experience in a related position or an equivalent number of other related courses.

The compensation of the director shall be established by the committee, subject to the approval of the county legislative body.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 6; 1986, ch. 732, § 1.

5-21-107. Director — Duties.

The director shall oversee the operation of the department in the functions established by this chapter, and shall be responsible for the implementation of the policies of the committee or such special committees established by the county legislative body.

The director shall, among the director's duties, install and maintain a purchasing, payroll, budgeting, accounting and cash financial management system for the county.

The director shall assist other county officials and employees in achieving an efficient financial management system for the county.

The director has the authority to hire personnel for the finance department; provided, that the positions are funded in the annual budget and the personnel so hired meet the written job requirements as recommended by the director and approved by the committee.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 7.

5-21-108. Director — Deputy.

A person employed by the finance department shall be recommended by the director and approved by the committee to serve as deputy director of finance.

The person employed for this position shall perform such duties and responsibilities as assigned by the director.

In the absence of the director, the deputy director shall perform the duties of the director necessary to the continued operation of the department, including, but not limited to, the cosigning of warrants, payroll checks and purchase orders.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 8.

5-21-109. Director — Bond.

The director shall execute a blanket bond in an amount of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the faithful performance of the director's duties as director and of the department employees in accordance with the general law for such bonds.

The cost of such bond shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department for such purpose.

The amount of such bond may be increased subject to the approval of the committee, and additional appropriations by the county legislative body.

The bond shall be prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, approved by the county legislative body, recorded in the office of the county register of deeds and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 9; 1998, ch. 677, § 5; 2013, ch. 315, §§ 15, 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subsections (a) and (d), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

5-21-110. Budget — Preparation and committee review — Timeline and Budgetary process for LEA.

On or before February 1 of each year the budget committee, in conjunction with the director, shall prescribe the budgetary procedures, forms, calendar and other information as may be necessary to implement the budgetary procedures contained in this chapter.

On request of the budget committee each department or office of county government shall submit a proposed budget for the succeeding fiscal year and such other budgetary information requested by the director of the budget committee.

From information submitted the director shall prepare a consolidated budget document.

Such document shall show by item the amounts estimated by the various departments and officials required for the efficient operation of the county government from the county general fund, the debt service funds, highway funds, school funds and all other funds.

Such document shall show an estimate of the revenues to be received by each of the funds during the next fiscal year and an estimate of the unencumbered fund balance of each of such funds at the beginning of the fiscal year.

The director shall file the consolidated budget with the budget committee.

The budget committee shall review and present the recommended budget to the members of the county legislative body in accordance with a calendar and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (a) or the timeline provided in subsection (e).

Such budget shall contain an itemized and classified plan of all proposed expenditures and estimated receipts for the ensuing fiscal year as submitted by each department, office or agency and recommended by the budget committee, and shall conform to the uniform classification of accounts established by the director in accordance with the prescribed state uniform accounting system.

It is expressly provided that the classification of expenditures and receipts of any and all county school funds for any purpose, administered by the county board of education and county director of schools, shall conform to the classification of accounts as prescribed by the commissioner of education.

The budget committee shall fully provide in the budget for all requirements for debt service, interest and bond maturities and for any cash deficit in any fund at the beginning of the fiscal year, and shall propose a tentative tax rate to fund such budget. The budget committee shall fully provide for any court-ordered expenses, including, but not limited to, deputies' and assistants' salaries authorized by court order pursuant to title 8, chapter 20. The budget, when adopted, shall appropriate funds to fully comply with such court order. The county legislative body shall adopt any budget amendment necessary to implement such court order.

In the absence of a locally adopted calendar and procedures pursuant to subsection (a), the budgetary procedures for the county shall follow the following timeline:

No later than February 1, the director shall deliver forms for all budget requests to all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, and agencies;

No later than March 1, all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, or agencies except the local board of education shall deliver the appropriate estimates and budget request to the director;

No later than April 1, the county budget committee shall vote upon the proposed budget and the director shall notify the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency whether the county budget committee approves or rejects the proposed budget;

If approved, the director shall immediately forward the proposed budget to the county legislative body for consideration; or

If rejected, the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency shall submit a revised budget proposal to the director within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected.

No later than May 1, each LEA shall submit a proposed budget to the director; provided that, the LEA may amend the proposed budget after May 1;

No later than June 1, the county budget committee shall vote upon the proposed budget and the director shall notify the LEA whether the county budget committee approves or rejects the LEA's proposed budget;

If approved, the director shall immediately forward the proposed budget to the county legislative body for consideration; or

If rejected, the LEA shall submit a revised budget proposal to the director within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected;

If the county budget committee of the local governing body rejects the first and second budget proposals from any department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency, then the third and any subsequent proposals shall be delivered directly to the county legislative body which shall approve or reject the proposal within ten (10) business days of the body's receipt of the amended proposal; and

If rejected, the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency shall submit a revised budget proposal to the county legislative body within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected.

The timeline and budgetary process pursuant to this section may be waived or altered, if agreed upon by the county legislative body and the respective department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 10; 1993, ch. 515, § 4; 2016, ch. 1080, §§ 13, 14.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “in accordance with a calendar and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (a) or the timeline provided in subsection (e)” for “at least ten (10) days prior to the July meeting” at the end of (d)(2); and added (e) and (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. County financial management system of 1981 — debt service requirements. OAG 15-02, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/15).

5-21-111. Budget — Hearings — Supporting documents — County action — Continuing budget.

At least ten (10) days before the proposed budget is to be presented to the governing body, the budget committee shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation the proposed annual operating budget.

This budget shall contain a budgetary comparison for the following governmental funds:

General;

Highway/public works;

General purpose school fund; and

Debt service

that shall include comparisons of the proposed budget with the current year and the prior year.

The budgetary comparisons shall be by individual fund and shall summarize revenues by local taxes, state of Tennessee, federal government and other sources. Expenditures shall be summarized by salaries and other costs. The budgetary comparison shall also present beginning and ending fund balances and the number of employee positions.

Such publication shall also contain a notice of a public hearing to be conducted by the budget committee at which any citizen of the county upon five (5) days' written request shall have the right to appear and state such citizen's views on the budget.

The budget committee shall present the budget to the county legislative body in accordance with a calendar adopted pursuant to § 5-21-110(a) or the timeline provided in § 5-21-110(e).

The proposed budget shall be accompanied by a budget message explaining the financial program and outlining the services, work and activities to be financed by the proposed budget and a brief discussion of the means proposed for financing the expenditure program set forth in the budget.

With the proposed budget, the budget committee shall deliver to the county legislative body a budget appropriation resolution and a tax levy resolution.

The county legislative body may alter or revise the proposed budget except as to provision for debt service requirements and for other expenditures required by law. However, when reviewing the proposed budget of the county department of education, the county legislative body may only alter or revise the total amount of expenditures as proposed and such alterations or revisions shall comply with state law and regulations. Upon alteration or revision of the proposed budget of the department of education, the director of schools shall submit a revised budget within the total expenditures approved by the county legislative body within ten (10) days. If the revised budget complies with the amount of expenditures as adopted by the county legislative body, the revised budget will become the approved budget for the county department of education.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment.]

After the adoption of the budget, any county department, agency or official shall be entitled to a hearing before the county legislative body in order to justify any proposed additional requests or budget estimates.

The director may make quarterly allotments to any department, agency or official seeking a budget hearing in an amount not in excess of that approved in the budget for such quarter.

Upon amendment of the budget, the director shall make a supplemental allotment or impound the funds of any department, agency or official to bring such appropriations in line with the amended budget.

The budget, the appropriation resolution, and the tax levy resolution, as adopted, shall be spread upon the minutes of the county clerk.

In the event that the local fiscal body has not adopted a budget by July 1 of any year, and until a final operating budget is adopted, the operating budget for the year just ended and the appropriation resolution for the year shall continue in effect by operation of law without further action of the county legislative body; provided, however, all agencies of the county and other entities receiving appropriated county funds shall not during any month encumber funds in excess of the allotment for a comparable month of the preceding fiscal year, unless specifically authorized to do so by resolution of the county legislative body. The authorizing resolution must identify a corresponding funding source equal to the amount of excess allotment authorized. The excess allotments so authorized shall become a part of the final operating budget. During the time that the continuation operating budget is in effect, the budget may be amended according to the procedures for amending a final operating budget, and amendments shall be made as necessary to provide for debt obligations and court-ordered expenditures.

The continuing budget authorized by this subsection (h) may continue in effect for the months of July and August and, upon approval from the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee after a showing of extraordinary circumstances, may continue for the month of September; provided, however, no such continuation budget may extend beyond September 30 of any fiscal year. The county shall submit justification for extending the continuing budget through the month of September to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval by August 15. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may request any additional information as may be required to properly review the continuing budget extension request. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall report the comptroller's approval or disapproval to the county legislative body within seven (7) business days after receipt of the request and any requested supplemental documentation, upon which the county legislative body may take action to extend the continuing budget for the month of September. The fact that the county is operating under a continuation budget shall not, by itself, be grounds for disapproval of a tax and revenue anticipation note or other comparable financing.

If the county legislative body and the county school board fail to agree upon a budget for the county department of education by August 31 of any year, then, by operation of law, the budget for the county department of education shall be equal to the minimum budget required to comply with the local match and maintenance of effort provisions of the BEP. However, if for three (3) consecutive years, the county legislative body and school board fail to agree upon a budget and the department of education receives the minimum required funding for that fiscal year by operation of law, then, the budget in the third year shall include a mandatory increase that is equivalent to three percent (3%) of the required funding from local sources for schools; provided, however, this increase shall not be required if during any of those three (3) years the school board failed to submit its budget proposals in accordance with a calendar adopted pursuant to § 5-21-110(a) or the timeline provided in § 5-21-110(e).

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 11; 1991, ch. 484, § 7; 2012, ch. 775, § 1; 2015, ch. 170, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 1080, §§ 15, 16.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (e)(2) which read “The county legislative body shall finally adopt a budget in July.” and added (h).

The 2016 amendment, effective May 20, 2016, added (i).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “in accordance with a calendar adopted pursuant to § 5-21-110(a) or the timeline provided in § 5-21-110(e)” for “at the regular July meeting each year or at a special session called for this purpose prior to the regular July meeting” at the end of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 170, § 5. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. May 20, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 88-202, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 203 (12/2/88).

A county commission violates T.C.A. § 5-21-111(e)(1) if it votes to reduce the debt service portion of the budget proposed by its budget committee after the budget committee holds a public hearing on its budget proposal and submits that proposal to the commission. OAG 14-09, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/15/14).

County financial management system of 1981 — debt service requirements. OAG 15-02, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/15).

5-21-112. Appropriations — Later modifications — Impounding.

The appropriations made in the appropriation resolution, or any amendment thereto, shall constitute the limit to expenditures for the various purposes and from the several funds of such county for the fiscal year covered by the resolution, and no expenditure shall be made or obligation created in excess of such limitation.

Any resolution presented to the county legislative body in any fiscal year, after the original appropriation resolution has been adopted and the tax rate for the year fixed by the county legislative body, that provides for an appropriation in addition to those made in the original budget appropriation, shall specifically provide by tax levy sufficient revenues, or designate the source of funds to meet expenditures to be made in consequence of such additional appropriation.

If at any time during the fiscal year it shall become apparent that the revenues of any of the county's funds, together with its unencumbered cash balance at the beginning of such year, will not be sufficient to equal the amount of the original appropriations, it shall be the duty of the director to impound the appropriations from such fund in such amount as shall be necessary to balance such account. Nevertheless, the impoundment power provided by this section shall not apply to the funds appropriated to the offices of trustee, county clerk, assessor of property, clerks of courts, register of deeds or sheriff.

Upon the written approval of the committee, such impounded funds shall be released.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 12; 1993, ch. 515, § 5.

5-21-113. Expenditures — Minor adjustments.

The appropriations made by the county legislative body shall constitute authorization for the expenditures contained therein unless otherwise limited by the county legislative body.

Expenditures may be made and obligations created against any appropriation to an aggregate total of the amount appropriated.

The expenditures and encumbrances against the amounts appropriated shall be made only upon an order or authorization issued by the department.

No expenditures made or obligations created in any manner shall be valid or binding against the county except as provided by this chapter.

The budget committee, with the consent of any official, head of any department or division that may be affected, may make transfers and adjustments within the smallest budgetary itemization of any subdivision.

Any other transfers or adjustments shall be submitted to the budget committee for its recommendation to the county legislative body.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Personnel transfers in the sheriff's office — follow-up to OAG 07-106 (7/12/07), OAG 07-163, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 163 (12/12/07).

Transfer of county funds between major appropriation categories as a result of personnel adjustments in the sheriff's civil service system must be approved in accordance with applicable county budgeting statutes, OAG 07-106, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (7/12/07).

5-21-114. Monthly reports.

The director shall make a report at the end of each month showing the condition of the budget.

Such report shall show for each item of appropriation, or allotment thereof, the total expenditures for the month and the year to date, the amount of outstanding encumbrances and the amount of the unencumbered balance.

Such report shall also show for each fund an itemized statement of the revenues and receipts estimated for the year, the amount of the collections of each item for the month and the year to date and the unrealized portion of the estimate.

Each department head, elected official and board member shall be furnished copies of monthly reports for their respective departments as soon as the same are available.

The most recent of such reports shall be presented by the director at each regular session of the county legislative body.

At such time, the director shall advise the county legislative body of the condition of the budget, and of any adjustment or reduction of appropriations that should be made, and shall recommend any other action that, in the director's opinion, the county legislative body should take in order that the financial condition of the county is not impaired.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 14.

5-21-115. Accounting system — Preaudit of invoices, etc.

There shall be set up and maintained in the department a system of fiscal procedure, control and centralized accounting, which shall be under the administrative control and direction of the director. The procedures and records shall be maintained in accordance with § 5-21-103(d).

Before any obligation against the county shall be paid or any disbursement warrant or voucher issued, a detailed invoice, receivable copy of the purchase order, or such document indicating receipt of merchandise or service should be approved by the head of an office, department or agency for which the obligation was made and be filed with the director.

The director shall establish a system for making a careful preaudit of such invoice, purchase order, or other documents, including a comparison with any encumbrance document previously posted or filed authorizing such obligation, and shall approve for payment only such items as appear to be correct, properly authorized, and not exceeding the otherwise unencumbered balance of the allotments or appropriations against which they are chargeable.

Disbursement warrants shall be promptly prepared for all such approved obligations by the director, signed in accordance with § 5-21-116 and mailed or delivered to the payees thereof.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 15; 2018, ch. 495, § 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “§ 5-21-103(d)” for “§ 5-21-103(c)” at the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 495, § 11. February 22, 2018.

5-21-116. Disbursement warrants.

All disbursement warrants drawn on the county trustee for the obligations of all county departments, agencies, and officials, including the county mayor, the county highway department, and the county department of education, shall be signed as provided in this section.

The disbursement warrants shall be prepared in the finance department, and provided to each department for signing.

Upon preparation of such warrant by the finance department, the department head signing the disbursement warrant shall keep one (1) copy for filing in such department.

The original and all other copies of such warrant shall be returned to the director for such director's signature as a cosigner and for filing and mailing from the finance department.

A duplicate copy of all disbursement warrants, with all original invoices and other supporting documents attached thereto, shall be kept on file in the office of the director.

In lieu of each department agency or official signing disbursement warrants, the departments may authorize the director to use a signature plate in accordance with the general law and approval by the comptroller of the treasury.

If such signature plate is used, it shall be locked in a safe place when not in use and supervised by the person responsible for its safekeeping when in use.

A record shall be maintained indicating when the signature plate is used, numbers of the warrants signed, and the person using such plate.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 16; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-21-117. Payroll account.

The committee shall maintain a special county payroll account at a bank, in which disbursement warrants for the total of each payroll shall be deposited and against which individual net earning checks may be issued to each of the county employees.

The committee may authorize the issuance of such payroll checks on the signature of the director and, in such event, the depository bank shall be so instructed.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 17.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive [now county mayor] over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

5-21-118. Director as purchasing agent — Optional purchasing department.

The director or a deputy appointed by the director shall serve as the county purchasing agent and shall assist the committee in developing policies and procedures for implementing an economical and efficient purchasing system.

The following shall be the responsibility of the director:

The contract, purchase, or any obligation of the county for supplies, material, equipment, contractual services, rental of machinery, buildings, or equipment, transfer of materials, supplies, and equipment between county offices or agencies;

Supervision of storeroom or warehouse;

Contracts for building construction and the purchase of land;

Public sale of all surplus materials, equipment, buildings and land; and

Any other created obligation of the county.

Upon the recommendation of the committee and approval of the county legislative body or as authorized by the county legislative body, a separate purchasing department may be established with a person hired as purchasing agent for the county.

In the event a separate purchasing department is established and a purchasing agent is hired, all duties and responsibilities relative to purchasing shall be removed from the director.

Acts 1981, ch. 325, § 18.

Cross-References. County Purchasing Law of 1957, purchasing agent, § 5-14-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Authorization of the county commission is required for the sale of property of the county board of hospital directors; unless the county has adopted the County Purchasing Law of 1957, T.C.A. §§ 5-14-101, et seq., or the County Financial Management System of 1981, T.C.A. §§ 5-21-101, et seq., the commission may authorize sale of the property without advertising for bids, OAG 03-131, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 149 (10/03/03).

Authority of city and county to dispose of surplus real property by private sale. OAG 13-84, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (10/31/13).